nursery/apertium-es-ssp/analizador_sea.dix
  <pardef n="SIGUIENTESILABA2">
	<e><par n="REP"/></e>
	<e><par n="NM"/></e>
	<e><par n="DJ_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="FJ_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="O_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="Q_general"/></e>	 
	<e><par n="GB_general"/></e>	  
	<e><par n="LB_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="S_general"/></e>	  
	<e><par n="GBM_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="GBMQ_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="SPPP_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="SPP_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="SP_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="QBMG_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="LA_general"/></e>
  </pardef>
  
  
  <pardef n="SEPB">
	<e><par n="SEPBISILABICA"/><par n="SIGUIENTESILABA"/></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="SEPB2">
	<e><par n="SEPBISILABICA"/><par n="SIGUIENTESILABA2"/></e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="EXCEPCIONES">
	<e><p><l/><r>(bimanualidad=</r></p><par n="s_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
		<p><l/><r>(separador=</r></p><par n="sepbimanual_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
		<p><l/><r>(lugar=</r></p><par n="n_interno"/><par n="sepbisilabica_interno"/><par n="f_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
		<p><l/><r>(configuración=</r></p><par n="ograve_interno"/><par n="atilde_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
		<p><l/><r>(orientación=</r></p><par n="m_interno"/><par n="a_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
		<p><l/><r>(forma=</r></p><par n="l_interno"/><par n="e_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
	</e>
	<e><p><l/><r>(bimanualidad=</r></p><par n="s_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
		<p><l/><r>(separador=</r></p><par n="sepbimanual_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
		<p><l/><r>(lugar=</r></p><par n="b_interno"/><par n="sepbisilabica_interno"/><par n="g_interno"/><par n="punto_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
		<p><l/><r>(configuración=</r></p><par n="ograve_interno"/><par n="a_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
		<p><l/><r>(orientación=</r></p><par n="m_interno"/><par n="u_interno"/><par n="m_interno"/><par n="a_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
		<p><l/><r>(dirección=</r></p><par n="w_interno"/><par n="a_interno"/><p><l/><r>)</r></p>
	</e>	  
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="SILABAM">
	<e><par n="Q_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="G_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="L_general"/></e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="SILABAB">
	<e><par n="S_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="GBM_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="SP_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="SPP_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="SPPP_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="GBMQ_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="QBMG_general"/></e>
	<e><par n="LA_general"/></e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="SIGNO">
	<e><par n="SILABAM"/></e>	  
	<e><par n="SILABAM"/><par n="SEPB"/></e>
	<e><par n="SILABAM"/><par n="SEPB"/><par n="SEPB"/></e>
	<e><par n="SILABAM"/><par n="SEPB"/><par n="SEPB"/><par n="SEPB"/></e>
	
	<e><par n="SILABAB"/></e>	  
	<e><par n="SILABAB"/><par n="SEPB2"/></e>
	<e><par n="SILABAB"/><par n="SEPB2"/><par n="SEPB2"/></e>
	<e><par n="SILABAB"/><par n="SEPB2"/><par n="SEPB2"/><par n="SEPB2"/></e>
  </pardef>  
  
</pardefs>

	<e><par n="SIGNO"/></e>
	<e><par n="EXCEPCIONES"/></e>
